Hawaii statutes.
[§353-135] Law enforcement
cooperation. The attorney general, and the chief of police and prosecuting
attorney of each county, shall cooperate with the department in establishing
and maintaining the system. [L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next